Utah statutes.
63F-1-107.   Divisions of department -- Administration.

(1)  The department shall be composed of the following divisions:

(a)  the Division of Enterprise Technology;

(b)  the Division of Integrated Technology; and

(c)  the Division of Agency Services.

(2)  Each division shall be administered and managed by a division director.



Enacted by Chapter 169, 2005 General Session

